District of Columbia statutes.
38-809

Appropriations for distribution of commodities.

Appropriations are hereby authorized to enable the Board of Education to carry out the contracts and programs authorized by § 38-808.

Oct. 8, 1951, 65 Stat. 370, ch. 448, title II, § 202
1981 Ed., § 31-809.
1973 Ed., § 31-1410.